Illinois, session 104th, SB4212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Private Well, Septic, and Water Infrastructure Housing Impact 6Task Force Act. 7    Section 5. Findings; purpose.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that new residential 9development in areas served by private wells and septic 10systems may affect groundwater quality, drinking water safety, 11environmental resources, and the reliability of wastewater and 12water infrastructure throughout Illinois.13    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish a statewide 14task force to evaluate how new housing development affects 15private wells, septic systems, groundwater, and related public 16health and environmental concerns, and to provide 17recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly based 18on those findings. 19    Section 10. Task Force creation and membership.20    (a) The Private Well, Septic, and Water Infrastructure 21Housing Impact Task Force is created.22    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:  SB4212- 2 -LRB104 22243 BDA 38578 b1        (1) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 2    of Representatives;3        (2) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 4    House of Representatives;5        (3) one member appointed by the President of the 6    Senate;7        (4) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 8    Senate;9        (5) one member appointed by the Governor who 10    represents a statewide association of municipalities;11        (6) one member appointed by the Governor who 12    represents a statewide association of county boards;13        (7) two members appointed by the Governor who are 14    mayors of municipalities experiencing residential growth;15        (8) the Director of the Environmental Protection 16    Agency, or the Director's designee;17        (9) the Director of Public Health, or the Director's 18    designee;19        (10) one member appointed by the Governor who 20    represents a county health department that administers 21    septic permitting;22        (11) one member appointed by the Governor who is a 23    licensed professional engineer with expertise in water or 24    wastewater systems;25        (12) one member appointed by the Governor who is a 26    hydrogeologist with expertise in groundwater resources;  SB4212- 3 -LRB104 22243 BDA 38578 b1        (13) one member appointed by the Governor who 2    represents a statewide environmental advocacy 3    organization;4        (14) one member appointed by the Governor who 5    represents home builders or residential developers; and6        (15) one member appointed by the Governor who 7    represents rural homeowners who rely on private wells and 8    septic systems.9    (c) After all members are appointed, the Task Force shall 10elect a chairperson from among its members and may elect other 11officers as it deems appropriate.12    (d) A vacancy on the Task Force shall be filled in the same 13manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the 14unexpired term.15    (e) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 16compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in 17performing their duties, subject to the rules of the 18appropriate travel control board. 19    Section 15. Duties; meetings; administrative support; 20report.21    (a) The Task Force shall study and make recommendations 22concerning:23        (1) the impact of new residential development on 24    private wells, groundwater supplies, and aquifers;25        (2) the capacity of existing septic systems and local   SB4212- 4 -LRB104 22243 BDA 38578 b1    wastewater infrastructure to accommodate population 2    growth;3        (3) strategies to prevent contamination of drinking 4    water sources from septic system failures, stormwater 5    runoff, and increased development;6        (4) best practices for maintaining and inspecting 7    private wells and septic systems in growing communities;8        (5) methods to protect groundwater quality, wetlands, 9    streams, and other environmental resources affected by 10    housing development;11        (6) the need for additional State guidance, permitting 12    requirements, or funding programs to support safe well and 13    septic infrastructure;14        (7) coordination among State agencies, counties, 15    municipalities, and public health departments regarding 16    areas served by private wells and septic systems; and17        (8) public education and technical assistance programs 18    for homeowners regarding proper well and septic 19    maintenance.20    (b) The Task Force shall meet at the call of the 21chairperson and as often as necessary to accomplish its work.22    (c) The Environmental Protection Agency and the Department 23of Public Health shall provide administrative and technical 24support to the Task Force.25    (d) On or before December 31, 2027, the Task Force shall 26submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly   SB4212- 5 -LRB104 22243 BDA 38578 b1summarizing its findings and recommendations regarding 2drinking water protection; septic system capacity, 3maintenance, and regulation; environmental impacts of 4residential development; improvements to State and local 5regulatory structures; funding and technical assistance needs; 6and long-term planning for communities dependent on private 7wells and septic systems. The report shall be submitted in 8accordance with Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 9Organization Act. 10    Section 90. Repeal. The Task Force is dissolved, and this 11Act is repealed, on January 1, 2029.